North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3B. State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-48.56.
Education of covered active and retired employees.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that active employees and retired employees covered under the Plan and its successor Plan shall have several opportunities in each fiscal year to attend presentations conducted by Plan management staff providing
detailed information about benefits, limitations, premiums, co-payments, and other pertinent Plan matters. To this end, the Plan’s management staff shall conduct multiple presentations each year to Plan members and association groups
representing active and retired employees across all geographic regions of the State. Regional meetings shall be held in locations that afford reasonably convenient access to Plan members. The presentations shall be designed not only
to present information about the Plan but also to hear and respond to Plan members’ questions and concerns.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 2; 1985, c. 732, ss. 7, 9, 23, 24, 50, 51; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 3, 20; 1987, c. 857, ss. 6, 7; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1091, s. 5; 1989, c. 752,
s. 22(a); 1991, c. 427, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.3; 1997-468, s. 2; 1997-519, s. 3.15; 1998-1, s. 4(c); 2000-141, s. 3; 2001-253, ss. 1(a), 1(q); 2001-487, s. 85.5; 2006-249, s. 4(b); 2007-323, s. 28.22(i); 2008-107,
s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (k), (j); 2009-16, s. 5(b); 2011-85, s. 2.5(d); 2011-326, s. 27.

§ 135-48.57.
Payments for county or city ambulance service.

Allowable payments for services provided by a county or city ambulance service shall be paid directly or shall be co-payable to the county or city ambulance service provider. As used in this subsection, “county or city ambulance service” means ambulance
services provided by a county or county-franchised ambulance service supplemented by county funds, or a municipally owned and operated ambulance service or by an ambulance service supplemented by municipal funds.

History.
1981, c. 355; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, ss. 3, 4; 1983, c. 922, s. 21.10; 1985, c. 732, s. 38; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 1998-1, s. 4(h); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(c); 2008-107, s. 10.13(m); 2008-168, s.
1(a), (c), (d); 2009-16, s. 5(f); 2009-83, s. 1; 2010-194, s. 18(a); 2011-85, s. 2.4(a).

§ 135-48.58.
Premiums for firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of National Guard.

In setting premiums for firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard, and their eligible dependents, the Plan shall establish rates separate from those affecting other members of the Plan. These separate premium rates shall include
rate factors for incurred but unreported claim costs, for the effects of adverse selection from voluntary participation in the Plan, and for any other actuarially determined measures needed to protect the financial integrity of the
Plan for the benefit of its served employees, retired employees, and their eligible dependents.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 52; 1991, c. 427, s. 5; 1997-468, s. 4; 1998-1, s. 4(e); 1999-237, s. 28.29(h); 2003-69, s. 2; 2004-124, s. 31.21(c); 2005-276, s. 29.31(e); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(m),
(m1), (o); 2007-345, ss. 11, 12; 2008-107, s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (m); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-571, s. 3(c); 2011-85, ss. 2.5(f), 2.10.

§ 135-48.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Long-term Care Benefits.

§§ 135-48.60 through 135-48.62.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-173, s. 3(d), effective January 1, 2013.

History.
S. 135-48.60; 1997-468, s. 7; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 4(a)-(c); 2011-85, ss. 2.7, 2.10; repealed by 2012-173, s. 3(d), effective January 1, 2013. s. 135-48.61; 1997-468, s. 7; 2008-168,
ss. 1(a), 4(a), (d), (e); 2011-85, ss. 2.7, 2.10, repealed by 2012-173, s. 3(d), effective January 1, 2013. s. 135-48.62; 1997-468, s. 7; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 4(a); 2011-85, s. 2.7, repealed by 2012-173, s. 3(e), effective January 1,
2013.

§ 135-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.